Mississippi, session 2026, HB1355.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The following sum, or so much of it as may be necessary, is appropriated out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, to Marshall County, Mississippi, to assist in paying costs associated with planning, engineering and environmental needs related to the completion of the Byhalia Railroad Bridge Project as described in Section 2 of this act for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027............................................. $    800,000.00. SECTION 2.  The Byhalia Railroad Bridge Project consists of the following: (a)  A bridge over the Burlington Northern Santa Fe (BNSF) Railroad and Old Highway 78 with access ramps; (b)  A bridge over Byhalia Creek; (c)  Approximately 1.5 miles of two-lane road from Old Highway 78 to Bubba Taylor Road, along with improvements to the existing Bubba Taylor Roadway running to Mississippi Highway 309 south of I-269 to State Aid Standards; and (d)  A gravity sewer line and lift station along the new right-of-way to improve drainage in the area west of Byhalia Creek to the Byhalia High School and Bubba Taylor Road. SECTION 3.  The money appropriated by this act shall be paid by the State Treasurer out of any money in the State General Fund not otherwise appropriated, upon warrants issued by the State Fiscal Officer; and the State Fiscal Officer shall issue the warrants upon requisitions signed by the proper person, officer or officers in the manner provided by law. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.